Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2679.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1305(a) and (b) of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended to read:Section 1305. Filing and payment of claim.(a) General rule.--[Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a] A claim for property tax or rent rebate shall be filed with the department on or before [the 30th day of June] December 31 of the year next succeeding the end of the calendar year in which real property taxes or rent was due and payable.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 [(b) Exception.--A claim filed after the June 30 deadline until December 31 of such calendar year shall be accepted by the secretary as long as funds are available to pay the benefits to the late filing claimant.]* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2679PN3722 - 2 - 123456